Utah statutes.
35A-8-302.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Bonus payments" means that portion of the bonus payments received by the United States government under the Leasing Act paid to the state under Section 35 of the Leasing Act, 30 U.S.C. Sec. 191, together with any interest that had accrued on those payments.

(2)  "Impact board" means the Permanent Community Impact Fund Board created under Section 35A-8-304.

(3)  "Impact fund" means the Permanent Community Impact Fund established by this chapter.

(4)  "Interlocal Agency" means a legal or administrative entity created by a subdivision or combination of subdivisions under the authority of Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act.

(5)  "Leasing Act" means the Mineral Lands Leasing Act of 1920, 30 U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq.

(6)  "Qualifying sales and use tax distribution reduction" means that, for the calendar year beginning on January 1, 2008, the total sales and use tax distributions a city received under Section 59-12-205 were reduced by at least 15% from the total sales and use tax distributions the city received under Section 59-12-205 for the calendar year beginning on January 1, 2007.

(7)  "Subdivision" means a county, city, town, county service area, special service district, special improvement district, water conservancy district, water improvement district, sewer improvement district, housing authority, building authority, school district, or public postsecondary institution organized under the laws of this state.



Amended by Chapter 9, 2012 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

